test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-xadasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - хадась: # Verb 'to kill / tappaa' - full paradigm - Type 1, transitive
 #_[5-A-tr]_xada-_’tappaa’_TV_=_Bi-syll_a-vartalo_[MDTN-koodit_a,_ya]
     хадась+V+TV+Ger: [хада, хадась]
     хадась+V+TV+GerFin: хадаванзь
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+Abs: хадава
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+Abs: хадавам’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+Abs: хадава’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+Abs: хадаван’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+Abs: хадавахана
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+Abs: хадавахад
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+Abs: хадававна
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+Abs: хадаваха’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+Abs: хадаваха’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+Abs: хадаваха’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+Abs: хадава”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+Abs: хадаби
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+Abs: хадаби”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+Abs: хадаваха”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+Abs: хадаваха”на
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+Abs: хадавахат
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+Abs: хадаби”мна
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [хадавав, хадавами]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [хадавав, хадавами]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [хадаван, хадавани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [хадавахан, хадавахани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [хадаваханан, хадаваханани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [хадавахадан, хадавахадани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [хадававнан, хадававнани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [хадавахаюн, хадавахаюни]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [хадавахаюн, хадавахаюни]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [хадавахаюн, хадавахаюни]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [хадабин, хадабини]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [хадабин,хадабини]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [хадаби”н, хадаби”ни]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [хадаваха”н, хадаваха”ни]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [хадаваха”нан, хадаваха”нани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [хадавахатан, хадавахатани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [хадаби”мнан, хадаби”мнани]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: хадавар
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: хадавамд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: хадаванд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: хадаваханд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: хадавахананд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: хадавахаданд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: хадававнанд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg2: хадавахаюд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg2: хадавахаюд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg2: хадавахают
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: хадабид
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: хадабид
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: хадабит
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: хадавахат
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: хадаваха”нат
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: хадавахатат
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: хадаби”мнат
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: хадавада
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: хадавамда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: хадаванда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: хадаваханда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: хадавахананда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: хадавахаданда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: хадававнанда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg3: хадавахаюда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg3: хадавахаюда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg3: хадавахаюта
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: хадабида
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: хадабида
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: хадабита
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: хадавахата
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: хадаваха”ната
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: хадавахатата
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: хадаби”мната
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: хадавами’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: хадавами
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: хадавами’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: хадавами
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: хадавани’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: хадавани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: хадавахани’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: хадавахани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: хадаваханани’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: хадаваханани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: хадавахадани’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: хадавахадани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: хадававнани’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: хадававнани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu1: хадавахаюни’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: хадавахаюни
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu1: хадавахаюни’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: хадавахаюни
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu1: хадавахаюни’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: хадавахаюни
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: хадабини’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: хадабини
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: хадабини’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: хадабини
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: хадаби”ни’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: хадаби”ни
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: хадаваха”ни’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: хадаваха”ни
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: хадаваха”нани’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: хадаваха”нани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: хадавахатани’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: хадавахатани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: хадаби”мнани’
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: хадаби”мнани
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: хадавари’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: хадавамди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: хадаванди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: хадаваханди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: хадавахананди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: хадавахаданди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: хадававнанди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu2: хадавахаюди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu2: хадавахаюди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu2: хадавахаюти’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: хадабиди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: хадабиди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: хадабити’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: хадавахати’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: хадаваха”нати’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: хадавахатати’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: хадаби”мнати’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: хадавади’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: хадавамди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: хадаванди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: хадаваханди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: хадавахананди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: хадавахаданди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: хадававнанди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu3: хадавахаюди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu3: хадавахаюди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu3: хадавахаюти’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: хадабиди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: хадабиди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: хадабити’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: хадавахати’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: хадаваха”нати’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: хадавахатати’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: хадаби”мнати’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: хадавава”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: хадавава”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: хадавана”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: хадавахана”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: хадаваханана”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: хадавахадана”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: хадававнана”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl1: хадавахаюна”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl1: хадавахаюна”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl1: хадавахаюна”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: хадабина”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: хадабина”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: хадаби”на”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: хадаваха”на”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: хадаваха”нана”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: хадавахатана”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: хадаби”мнана”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: хадавара”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: хадавамда”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: хадаванда”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: хадаваханда”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: хадавахананда”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: хадавахаданда”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: хадававнанда”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl2: хадавахаюда”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl2: хадавахаюда”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl2: хадавахаюта”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: хадабида”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: хадабида”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: хадабита”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: хадавахата”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: хадаваха”ната”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: хадавахатата”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: хадаби”мната”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: хадавадо’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: хадавамдо’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: хадавандо’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: хадавахандо’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: хадаваханандо’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: хадавахадандо’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: хадававнандо’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl3: хадавахаюдо’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl3: хадавахаюдо’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl3: хадавахаюто’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: хадабидо’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: хадабидо’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: хадабито’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: хадавахато’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: хадаваха”нато’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: хадавахатато’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: хадаби”мнато’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Abs: хадавад
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [хадавадав, хадавадув, хадавадами, хадавадми]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [хадавадав, хадавадув, хадавадами, хадавадми]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [хадавадан, хадавадани, хадавадни]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: хадавадар
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: хадавадамд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: хадаваданд
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [хадавадада, хадавадда]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: хадавадамда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: хадаваданда
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [хадавадами’, хадавадми’]
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [хадавадами, хадавадми]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [хадавадами’, хадавадми’]
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [хадавадами, хадавадми]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [хадавадани’, хадавадни’]
#     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [хадавадани, хадавадни]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [хадавадари’, хадавадри’]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: хадавадамди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: хадаваданди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [хадавадади’, хадавадди’]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: хадавадамди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: хадаваданди’
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [хадавадава”, хадавадва”]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [хадавадава”, хадавадва”]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [хадавадана”, хадавадна”]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [хадавадара”, хадавадра”]
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: хадавадамда”
     хадась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: хадаваданда”
